Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits  for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed,
for the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing,
furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Various Deferred
Maintenance Projects ............... $ 15,500,000
(b) Construction Project
Planning.................................... $ 3,500,000
(c) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ................. $ 6,500,000
(d) Building Automation Systems .. $ 5,000,000
(e) Security and Systems
Investment/Upgrades ................ $ 2,500,000
(f) Portfolio Repositioning ............. $ 11,250,000
(g) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions .................... $ 2,000,000
(h) Capitol Mall Medium Voltage
Design ....................................... $ 500,000
(i) Parking Lot/EV Charging
Stations..................................... $ 3,000,000
(2) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT)/Permanent Supportive
Housing Programs .................... $600,000,000
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem Owen Summers Building
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 1
Service Life Extension .............. $ 2,909,970
(b) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ........ $ 5,500,000
(4) Department of State Police:
(a) Central Point Office
Expansion.................................. $ 26,500,000
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ........ $ 21,320,000
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office........................ $ 7,278,186
(5) Department of Corrections:
(a) Camera System ......................... $ 8,500,000
(b) Capital Improvement and
Renewal..................................... $ 50,000,000
(c) Wireless Communication
System ...................................... $ 12,900,000
(6) Oregon Youth Authority,
Capital Improvements -
All Facilities .............................. $ 2,750,000
(7) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the
Deaf Capital Improvements ...... $ 3,500,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Klamath Facility Replacement .. $ 1,500,000
(b) Salem Airport Hangar ............... $ 2,000,000
(9) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ....... $ 2,500,000
(10) Oregon Health Authority:
(a) Junction City Single Unit
Remodel .................................... $ 5,000,000
(b) PLC System Replacement ......... $ 3,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Aurora Airport Obstruction
Removal and Easement ............. $ 154,000
(b) Aurora Airport Runway
17-35 Rehab ............................... $ 275,000
(c) Chiloquin Airport
Obstruction Removal ................ $ 132,000
(d) Cottage Grove Airport
EA and Apron Rehab ................ $ 164,389
(e) Lebanon Airport Taxiway
Reconstruct/Drain .................... $ 526,436
(12) Department of Transportation,
Maintenance Station
Improvements ........................... $ 38,000,000
(13) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ................. $215,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 2
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits  for pay-
ment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the state agencies listed, for
the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing,  altering, repairing, fur-
nishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation:
(a) Aurora Airport Obstruction
Removal and Easement ............. $ 1,386,000
(b) Aurora Airport Runway
17-35 Rehab ............................... $ 2,475,000
(c) Chiloquin Airport
Obstruction Removal ................ $ 1,188,000
(d) Cottage Grove Airport
EA and Apron Rehab ................ $ 1,479,500
(e) Lebanon Airport Taxiway
Reconstruct/Drain .................... $ 4,737,919
(2) Oregon Military Department,
Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ........ $ 5,500,000
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$327,713,551 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state  bonds issued
for the benefit of a public  university, pursuant to agreements between the commission and
a public university.
SECTION 3a. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of
$37,500,000 is  established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state  bonds issued
for the benefit of a community college, pursuant to agreements between the commission  and
a community college.
SECTION 4. The project approvals and expenditure limitations in sections 1, 2, 3 and  3a
of this 2023 Act and the expenditure limitations established by  the Emergency Board during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for capital construction or acquisition  projects, expire
on June 30, 2029, unless otherwise noted.
SECTION 5. The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure  limitations
authorized by the Legislative Assembly for the following projects  are extended to the fol-
lowing dates:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Department of Human Services
Building Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(b), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
(b) Employment Building Upgrades
(Other Funds) (section 1 (1)(c),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 3
(c) Electrical Upgrades and
Replacements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(d), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
(d) Capitol Mall Parking Structure
Study and Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(e), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
(e) Boiler and Heating Upgrades
(Other Funds) (section 1 (1)(g),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
(2) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (7)(d), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2024
(b) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation (Federal Funds)
(section 2 (4), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2024
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (2)(a), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2024
(b) Camp Umatilla Regional Training
Institute Re-Set project (Federal Funds)
(December 14, 2018, Emergency
Board Item No. 25, as amended by
September 25, 2020, Emergency
Board Item No. 33, as amended
by section 10, chapter 659,
Oregon Laws 2021) .................... June 30, 2024
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvements and
Renewal (Other Funds)
(section 1 (4)(a), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
(b) Technology Infrastructure
(Other Funds) (section 1 (4)(b),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
(5) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(c), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
(b) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(b), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2025
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 4
(c) Capital Improvements (Other
Funds) (section 1 (3)(a),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
(6) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, Public University
Capital Construction Bonds
(Other Funds) (section 3,
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
(7) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement
(Other Funds) (section 1 (9),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
SECTION 6.
The Legislative Assembly approves the proposal of the  Oregon Military De-
partment, submitted in accordance with ORS 396.515 (4), for the sale of the  Christmas Valley
property which consists of 2,655 acres of land in Christmas Valley, Oregon.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 5